Utah statutes.
9-8-601.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Complete" means to be similar in nature and purpose to an encyclopedia, wherein all of the meaningful events that took place in the county are covered, including ecclesiastic, political, educational, economic, and social events.

(2)  "Division" means the Division of State History.

(3)  "Reliable" means information that is as correct and factual as possible, well-documented, and based on established precedent.

